Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-123.07
Nonbeverage user's license; rights of licensee; importation of alcohol; classes of license.

A nonbeverage user's license shall allow the licensee to purchase alcoholic liquor from a licensed manufacturer or wholesaler without the imposition of any tax upon the business of such licensed manufacturer or wholesaler as to such alcoholic liquor to be used by such licensed nonbeverage user solely for the nonbeverage purposes set forth in subsection (4) of section 53-160. If any licensed nonbeverage user is engaged in the business of manufacturing, compounding, or preparing pharmaceutical products or similar preparations or products containing alcohol to be sold in both intrastate and interstate commerce, such nonbeverage user's license shall allow the licensee to purchase at wholesale or otherwise from manufacturers or wholesalers not licensed in the state and to import alcohol either in barrels, drums, casks, or other containers. If any licensed nonbeverage user is engaged in the business of manufacturing or preparing food products containing alcoholic liquor to be sold in both intrastate and interstate commerce, such nonbeverage user's license shall allow the licensee to purchase at wholesale from alcoholic liquor wholesalers licensed within the state alcoholic liquor either in barrels, drums, casks, or other containers, and such alcoholic liquor wholesalers may cause such alcoholic liquor to be shipped or delivered directly to such nonbeverage user from the source of supply, in which event all such shipments or deliveries shall be considered as received by such alcoholic liquor wholesalers within this state and at their licensed premises and purchased by such alcoholic liquor wholesalers and for their account, and all such shipments or deliveries shall be recorded and reported by such alcoholic liquor wholesalers as required by section 53-165. All such licenses shall be divided and classified and shall permit the purchase during the term for which such licenses are issued of limited and stated quantities of alcoholic liquor as follows:

Class 1, not to exceed.....100 gallons

Class 2, not to exceed.....1,000 gallons

Class 3, not to exceed.....5,000 gallons

Class 4, not to exceed.....10,000 gallons

Class 5, in excess of.....10,000 gallons.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 25, p. 390;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-325;

R.S.1943, § 53-123;

Laws 1947, c. 187, § 1(7), p. 618;

Laws 1947, c. 188, § 1(7), p. 623;

Laws 1965, c. 319, § 2, p. 908;

Laws 1971, LB 466, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 21.